North Carolina statutes. Chapter 166A. North Carolina Emergency Management Act.
Article 1A. North Carolina Emergency Management Act.
§ 166A-19.73.
Compensation.

Extent of Compensation. — Compensation for services or for the taking or use of property shall be only to the extent that legal obligations of individual citizens are exceeded in a particular case and then only to the extent that the claimant has not been deemed to have volunteered his services or property without compensation.

Limitation; Basis of Compensation. — Compensation for property shall be only if the property was commandeered, seized, taken, condemned, or otherwise used in coping with an emergency and this action was ordered by the Governor. The State shall make compensation for the property so seized, taken, or condemned on the following basis:

In case property is taken for temporary use, the Governor, within 30 days of the taking, shall fix the amount of compensation to be paid for such damage or failure to return. Whenever the Governor shall deem it advisable for the State to take title to property taken under this section, the Governor shall forthwith cause the owner of such property to be notified thereof in writing by registered mail, postage prepaid, or by the best means available, and forthwith cause to be filed a copy of said notice with the Secretary of State.

If the person entitled to receive the amounts so determined by the Governor as just compensation is unwilling to accept the same as full and complete compensation for such property or the use thereof, the person shall be paid seventy-five percent (75%) of such amount and shall be entitled to recover from the State of North Carolina in an action brought in the superior court in the county of residence of claimant, or in Wake County, in the same manner as other condemnation claims are brought, within three years after the date of the Governor’s award.

History.

1977, c. 848, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.74.
Nondiscrimination in emergency management.

State and local governmental bodies and other organizations and personnel who carry out emergency management functions under the provisions of this Article are required to do so in an equitable and impartial manner. Such State and local governmental bodies, organizations, and personnel shall not discriminate on the grounds of race, color, religion, nationality, sex, age, or economic status in the distribution of supplies, the processing of applications, and other relief and assistance activities.

History.

1975, c. 734, s. 3; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 128; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.75.
Emergency management personnel.

Limitation. — No person shall be employed or associated in any capacity in any emergency management agency established under this Article if that person does or has done any of the following:

Advocates or has advocated a change by force or violence in the constitutional form of the Government of the United States or in this State.

Advocates or has advocated the overthrow of any government in the United States by force or violence.

Has been convicted of any subversive act against the United States.

Is under indictment or information charging any subversive act against the United States.

Has ever been a member of the Communist Party.

Oath. — Each person who is appointed to serve in any emergency management agency shall, before entering upon the person’s duties, take a written oath before a person authorized to administer oaths in this State, which oath shall be substantially as follows:“I, _______________ , do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of North Carolina, against all enemies, foreign and domestic; and that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I take this obligation freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties upon which I am about to enter. And I do further swear (or affirm) that I do not advocate, nor am I, nor have I ever knowingly been, a member of any political party or organization that advocates the overthrow of the Government of the United States or of this State by force or violence; and that during such time as I am a member of the State Emergency Management Agency I will not advocate nor become a member of any political party or organization that advocates the overthrow of the Government of the United States or of this State by force or violence, so help me God.”

No Violation of Dual Office Holding Prohibition. — No position created by or pursuant to this Article shall be deemed an office within the meaning of Section 9 of Article 6 of the North Carolina Constitution.

History.

1951, c. 1016, s. 10; 1975, c. 734, ss. 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 129; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.76.
Leave options for voluntary firefighters, rescue squad workers, and emergency medical service personnel called into service.

Leave Without Pay. — A member of a volunteer fire department, rescue squad, or emergency medical services agency called into service of the State after a declaration of a state of emergency by the Governor or by the General Assembly, or upon the activation of the State Emergency Response Team in response to an emergency, shall have the right to take leave without pay from his or her civilian employment. No member of a volunteer fire department, rescue squad, or emergency medical services agency shall be forced to use or exhaust his or her vacation or other accrued leave from his or her civilian employment for a period of active service. The choice of leave shall be solely within the discretion of the member.

Request in Writing Required. — For the volunteer member to be entitled to take leave without pay pursuant to this section, his or her services shall be requested in writing by the Director of the Division or by the head of a local emergency management agency. The request shall be directed to the Chief of the member’s volunteer fire department, rescue squad, or emergency medical services agency, and a copy shall be provided to the member’s employer. This section shall not apply to those members whose services have been certified by their employer to the Director of the Division, or to the head of a local emergency management agency, as essential to the employer’s own ongoing emergency relief activities.

Definition of an Emergency Requiring Activation of the State Emergency Response Team. — For purposes of this section, an emergency requiring the activation of the State Emergency Response Team means an emergency at Activation Level 2 or greater according to the North Carolina State Emergency Operations Plan of November 2002. Activation Level 2 requires the State Emergency Operations Center to be fully activated with 24-hour staffing from all State Emergency Response Team members.

Enforcement. — The Commissioner of Labor shall enforce the provisions of this section pursuant to Chapter 95 of the General Statutes.

History.

2003-103, s. 1; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.77.
North Carolina Forest Service designated as emergency response agency.

The North Carolina Forest Service of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is designated an emergency response agency of the State of North Carolina for purposes of the following:

Supporting the North Carolina Forest Service in responding to all-risk incidents.

Receipt of any applicable State or federal funding.

Training of other State and local agencies in emergency management.

Any other emergency response roles for which the North Carolina Forest Service has special training or qualifications.

History.

2005-128, s. 1; 2011-145, ss. 13.25(ww), 19.1(g); 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2013-155, s. 24.

§ 166A-19.77A.
Agricultural Emergency Response Teams authorized.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is designated as an emergency response agency for purposes of the following:

Deploying Agricultural Emergency Response Teams, as that term is defined in

G.S. 106-1042

, to respond to agriculture-related incidents.

Receipt of any applicable State or federal funding.

Training of other State and local agencies in agricultural emergency response.

Any other emergency response roles for which Agricultural Emergency Response Teams have special training or qualifications.

History.

2016-113, s. 2(b).

Cross References.

As to Agricultural Emergency Response Act, generally, see Article 85 of Chapter 106.

§ 166A-19.78.
Governor’s power to order evacuation of public building.

When it is determined by the Governor that a great public crisis, disaster, riot, catastrophe, or any other similar public emergency exists, or the occurrence of any such condition is imminent, and, in the Governor’s opinion it is necessary to evacuate any building owned or controlled by any department, agency, institution, school, college, board, division, commission, or subdivision of the State in order to maintain public order and safety or to afford adequate protection for lives or property, the Governor is hereby authorized to issue an order of evacuation directing all persons within the building to leave the building and its premises forthwith. The order shall be delivered to any law enforcement officer or officer of the National Guard, and such officer shall, by a suitable public address system, read the order to the occupants of the building and demand that the occupants forthwith evacuate said building within the time specified in the Governor’s order.

History.

1969, c. 1129; 1993, c. 539, s. 198; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2009-281, s. 1; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

Cross References.

As to misdemeanor violation of emergency prohibitions and restrictions, see

G.S. 14-288.20

A.

§ 166A-19.79.
Severability.

If any provision of this Article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Article are severable.

History.

1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 132; 2012-12, s. 1(b).